Nevada, session 83, AB173.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 281 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In addition to the requirements of NRS 281.571, a
candidate for judicial office must indicate on the financial
disclosure statement filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection
1 of NRS 281.561 the designation of his or her political party
affiliation for the purposes of voter registration.
2. As used in this section, “judicial office” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 293.064.
-
*AB173*

– 2 –
Sec. 2. NRS 281.5555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
281.5555 The provisions of NRS 281.5555 to 281.581,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act, may be cited as the Nevada
Financial Disclosure Act.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB173*